de: Paillettenfinish: Farbwechselnd; Glitzer; Glänzend; Holografisch; Irisierend; Matt; Metallic; Blickdicht; Perlmuttglänzend; Wendebar/Flip; Schimmernd; Transparent; Andere
pt-PT: Acabamento em lantejoulas: Mudança de cor; Purpurina; Brilhante; Holográfico; Iridescente; Mate; Metálico; Opaco; Perolado; Reversível/dupla face; Cintilante; Transparente; Outro
el: Φινίρισμα με πούλιες: Μεταβαλλόμενο χρώμα; Γκλίτερ; Γυαλιστερό; Ολογραφικό; Ιριδίζον; Ματ; Μεταλλικό; Αδιαφανές; Περλέ; Διπλής όψης/αναστρέψιμο; Λαμπερό; Διαφανές; Άλλο
ja: スパンコール仕上げ: カラーシフト; グリッター; 光沢; ホログラフィック; 虹色; マット; メタリック; 不透明; パール調; リバーシブル/フリップ; シマー; 透明; その他
da: Pailletfinish: Farveskiftende; Glimmer; Skinnende; Holografisk; Iriserende; Mat; Metallisk; Uigennemsigtig; Perlemor; Vendbar/flip; Glimtende; Gennemsigtig; Andet
lt-LT: Blizgučių apdaila: Besikeičiančios spalvos; Su blizgučiais; Blizgus; Holografinis; Vaivorykštinis; Matinis; Metalizuotas; Nepermatomas; Perlamutrinis; Dvipusis / atverčiamas; Žėrintis; Skaidrus; Kita
fr: Finition des paillettes: Couleur changeante; Paillettes; Brillant; Holographique; Irisé; Mat; Métallique; Opaque; Nacré; Réversible/à rabat; Chatoyant; Transparent; Autre
en: Sequin finish: Color shifting; Glitter; Glossy; Holographic; Iridescent; Matte; Metallic; Opaque; Pearlescent; Reversible/flip; Shimmer; Transparent; Other
sv: Paljettfinish: Färgskiftande; Glitter; Blank; Holografisk; Iriserande; Matt; Metallic; Opak; Pärlemor; Vändbar/flip; Skimmer; Transparent; Övrigt
it: Finitura delle paillettes: Cangiante; Glitter; Lucido; Olografico; Iridescente; Opaco; Metallizzato; Coprente; Perlato; Reversibile; Scintillante; Trasparente; Altro
fi: Paljettiviimeistely: Väriä vaihtava; Kimalle; Kiiltävä; Holografinen; Helmiäishohtoinen; Matta; Metallinen; Läpinäkymätön; Helmiäinen; Käännettävä/kääntyvä; Kimalteleva; Läpinäkyvä; Muu
vi: Hoàn thiện bằng kim sa: Chuyển màu; Kim tuyến; Bóng; Holographic; Ngũ sắc; Nhám; Ánh kim; Đục; Ánh ngọc trai; Đảo chiều/lật; Lấp lánh; Trong suốt; Khác
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava flitra: Meniace farbu; Trblietky; Lesklé; Holografické; Iridescentné; Matné; Metalické; Nepriehľadné; Perleťové; Obojstranné/preklápacie; Trblietavé; Priehľadné; Iné
hu: Flitterek típusa: Színjátszó; Csillámos; Fényes; Holografikus; Irizáló; Matt; Fémes; Átlátszatlan; Gyöngyházfényű; Megfordítható; Csillogó; Átlátszó; Egyéb
nb: Paljettfinish: Fargeskiftende; Glitter; Blank; Holografisk; Iridiserende; Matt; Metallisk; Ugjennomsiktig; Perlemor; Vendbar/vipp; Skimrende; Gjennomsiktig; Annet
tr: Payet yüzey bitişi: Renk değiştiren; Simli; Parlak; Holografik; Yanardöner; Mat; Metalik; Opak; Sedefli; Çift yönlü/çevrilebilir; Işıltılı; Şeffaf; Diğer
bg-BG: Финиш на пайетите: Променящ се цвят; Брокат; Гланц; Холограмно; Преливащо; Мат; Металик; Непрозрачно; Перлено; Двулицево/обръщащо се; Блестящо; Прозрачно; Друго
es: Acabado de lentejuelas: Cambio de color; Brillantina; Brillante; Holográfico; Iridiscente; Mate; Metálico; Opaco; Nacarado; Reversible/abatible; Reluciente; Transparente; Otro
pl: Wykończenie cekinami: Zmieniające kolor; Brokatowe; Błyszczące; Holograficzne; Opalizujące; Matowe; Metaliczne; Nieprzezroczyste; Perłowe; Dwustronne; Lśniące; Przezroczyste; Inne
th: ตกแต่งด้วยเลื่อม: เปลี่ยนสีตามมุมมอง; กลิตเตอร์; มันวาว; โฮโลแกรม; สีรุ้ง; ด้าน; เมทัลลิก; ทึบแสง; สีมุก; สลับด้าน/พลิกได้; ชิมเมอร์; โปร่งใส; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 亮片表面效果: 变色; 闪粉; 光泽; 全息; 虹彩; 哑光; 金属质感; 不透明; 珠光; 双面/翻转; 微光; 透明; 其他
cs: Flitrová úprava: Měnící barvy; Se třpytkami; Lesklé; Holografické; Měňavé; Matné; Metalické; Neprůhledné; Perleťové; Oboustranné / překlápěcí (flip); S leskem; Průhledné; Jiné
ro-RO: Finisajul paietelor: Schimbare de culoare; Sclipici; Lucios; Holografic; Iridescent; Mat; Metalic; Opac; Sidefat; Reversibil/cu două fețe (flip); Strălucitor; Transparent; Altele
ru: Отделка пайеток: Меняющая цвет (хамелеон); Глиттер; Глянцевая; Голографическая; Переливающаяся (перламутр); Матовая; Металлик; Непрозрачная; Перламутровая; Двусторонняя/перекидная; Шиммер; Прозрачная; Другое
sl-SI: Končni izgled bleščice: Prelivanje barv; Bleščice; Sijaj; Holografsko; Iridiscentno; Mat; Kovinsko; Neprozorno; Biserno; Dvostransko/obračljivo; Lesketajoče; Prozorno; Drugo
hr-HR: Završna obrada sa šljokicama: Promjena boje; Sa šljokicama; Sjajno; Holografsko; Prelijevajuće; Matirano; Metalik; Neprozirno; Biserno; Dvostrano / s okretanjem; Svjetlucavo; Prozirno; Ostalo
pt-BR: Lantejoula acabamento: Mudança de cor; Glitter; Brilhante; Holográfico; Iridescente; Fosco; Metálico; Opaco; Perolado; Reversível; Cintilante; Transparente; Outro
nl: Paillet afwerking: Kleurverschuivend; Glitter; Glanzend; Holografisch; Iriserend; Mat; Metallic; Dekkend; Parelmoer; Omkeerbaar/flip; Glinsterend; Transparant; Overig
zh-TW: 亮片表面處理: 變色; 閃粉; 亮面; 雷射全息; 虹彩; 霧面; 金屬感; 不透明; 珠光; 雙面/翻轉; 閃爍微光; 透明; 其他
ko: 스팽글 마감: 색상 변화; 글리터; 유광; 홀로그램; 무지갯빛; 무광; 메탈릭; 불투명; 펄; 양면/플립; 시머; 투명; 기타